New Jersey, session 222, A5012.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A health benefits plan that provides coverage of prescription drugs or pharmacy services that is administered or managed by a pharmacy benefits manager shall allow any pharmacy that meets the standard contract terms and conditions under the benefits plan to participate as a network pharmacy. b.    The terms and conditions of the contract shall be reasonable and relevant as determined by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance.  To determine what is reasonable and relevant, the commissioner shall review, among other items: (1)   current terms and conditions in network pharmacy contracts; and (2)   reimbursement and dispensing fees paid by the health benefits plans and if the payments are sufficient to cover ingredient and operational costs. 2.    The Commissioner of Banking and Insurance may adopt rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the thirteenth month next following the date of enactment and shall apply to contracts between a health benefits plan and a pharmacy benefits manager that are initiated or renewed on or after the date of enactment.